Illinois, session 104th, HB3587.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 45-115 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-115 new)7    Sec. 45-115. State data residency credit.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Earned credit" means the amount of the bid preference 10allocated to a vendor upon completion of a contract during 11which the vendor met a data residency commitment under this 12Section during the performance of a State contract. 13    "Qualified area" means an opportunity zone designated by 14the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 15    "State data" means the final version of information that: 16(1) is presented in alphanumeric form in a list, table, graph, 17chart, or other non-narrative form; (2) can be digitally 18stored and retrieved; (3) is created or maintained by or on 19behalf of a State agency; (4) is controlled by the State 20agency; and (5) is related to the mission of the State agency. 21"State data" does not include information that is: (1) 22provided to a State agency by another entity; (2) created or 23maintained by or on behalf of a State or federal public safety   HB3587- 2 -LRB104 03867 HLH 13891 b1official operating in that person's official capacity outside 2of the United States; (3) subject to one or more international 3exchange agreements for the exchange of criminal justice 4information with one or more foreign government agencies; or 5(4) created or maintained for the purpose of backup or 6recovery. 7    (b) Unless otherwise authorized by the Chief Information 8Officer of the applicable State agency, any contract 9advertised and entered into by the State on or after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly that provides for the storage of any State data shall 12include a requirement that the State data must be processed, 13stored, and disposed of within the territory of the United 14States. 15    (c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or State law, 16for any contract advertised and entered into by the State on or 17after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 18General Assembly that provides for the storage of State data, 19the Chief Procurement Officer shall allocate to any qualified 20bidder an earned credit of: (1) 2% of the contract base bid for 21ensuring that all State data that is included in the contract 22is stored within the State of Illinois; and (B) an additional 234% of the contract base bid for ensuring that all such State 24data is stored within a qualified area. Any earned credit 25allocated pursuant to this Section must be used within 3 years 26after issuance by the Chief Procurement Officer.  HB3587- 3 -LRB104 03867 HLH 13891 b1    (d) The Chief Procurement Officer may determine not to 2allocate an earned credit under this Section if the Chief 3Procurement Officer determines that doing so is not in the 4State's best interest. Any determination under this subsection 5is a final administrative decision and is subject to review 6under the Administrative Review Law. 7    (e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), if, as 8part of the contract closeout procedure, the Chief Procurement 9Officer determines that the vendor has successfully met its 10data residency commitment under this Section, the Chief 11Procurement Officer shall issue an earned credit certificate 12that evidences the amount of earned credit allocated to the 13vendor. The vendor may apply the earned credit as the bid 14preference for any future contract bid of equal or greater 15dollar value relative to the contract for which the credit was 16awarded. The credit certificate earned is valid for 3 years 17from the date of issuance and shall not be applied to any 18future contract bid after the expiration of that period. To 19receive the earned credit certificate, the vendor shall 20maintain accurate and detailed records necessary to monitor 21compliance with this Section and shall submit any reports 22required by the Chief Procurement Officer or the State 23Purchasing Officer of the supervising agency. Full access to 24vendors shall be granted to the Chief Procurement Officer, the 25State Purchasing Officer of the supervising Department, or any 26designee thereof. The vendor shall maintain all relevant   HB3587- 4 -LRB104 03867 HLH 13891 b1records for at least 3 years after the contract is completed. 2    (f) Any procurement issued for a data center to host State 3data shall include a provision that, if the data center is 4hosted within the State, then the proposal shall be awarded 5additional points equal to 10% of the total available points. 6If the data center is located in a qualified area, then, in 7addition to the points awarded under this subsection (f) for 8hosting within the State, the proposal shall be awarded an 9additional 10% of the total available points. 10    (g) Each State agency may adopt rules for the proper 11administration and enforcement of this Section, including, but 12not limited to, rules concerning eligibility for data centers 13to receive the additional points under subsection (f).